Oklahoma, session 2026, SB572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 5060.20a, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5060.20a. A. The Oklahoma Center for the Advancement
of Science and Technology (OCAST), in conjunction with the
Commercialization Center, may develop and implement a technology
business financing program to provide funding and financing for and
to assist qualified Oklahoma enterprises to commercialize new
products, services, technology, innovations, and processes. In
order to obtain funding or financing from the technology business
financing program, a recipient shall be required to obtain separate
private investment or funding, and may also be required to pay
royalties, fees, interest, profits, or other payments generated or
ENGR. S. B. NO. 572 Page 1

aris ing from the sale, lease, licensing, distribution, manufacture,
marketing, or development of products, services, technology,
innovations, and processes, whether alone or in conjunction with
others, or generated or arising from a sale, acquisition, merger, or
other transfer or takeover of the enterprise. Any such royalties,
fees, interest, profits, or other payments or return of funding and
financing shall be retained for use in the program. OCAST, in
conjunction with the Commercialization Center, shall establish
program specifications. OCAST may contract with the
Commercialization Center or other qualified entity to operate and
manage the program. Program funds shall not be used to pay
administrative, management, or operating expenses of OCAST.
B. The program authorized by subsection A of this section shall
cease on the effective date of this act. Any remaining funds upon
the cessation of the program shall be transferred to the State
Treasurer and placed to the credit of the General Revenue Fund. At
the end of each fiscal year, any royalties, fees, interest, profits,
or other payments or return of funding and financing received
pursuant to the program shall be transferred to the State Treasurer
and placed to the credit of the General Revenue Fund.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



ENGR. S. B. NO. 572 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 10th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 572 Page 3